Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1032.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 481, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 283, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 481), is amended to read as follows:
Section 481. A State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision
hereinafter referred to as the "Board", is hereby re-created, to
continue until July 1, 2025 2030, in accordance with the provisions
of the Oklahoma Sunset Law. The Board shall be composed of seven
(7) allopathic physicians licensed to practice medicine in this
state and represent the public and four (4) lay members. The
physician members of the Board shall be graduates of legally
chartered medical schools recognized by the Oklahoma State Regents
for Higher Education or the Liaison Council on Medical Education.
The physician members shall have actively practiced as licensed
physicians continuously in this state for the three (3) years
immediately preceding their appointment to the Board. All members
of the Board shall be residents of this state and shall be appointed
by the Governor as provided for in Section 482 of this title. All
present members of the Board shall continue to serve for the
remainder of their current terms.

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of February,
2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 21st day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1032 Page 2